Utah statutes.
19-3-313.   Reciprocity.

Waste may not be transported into and transferred, stored, decayed in storage, treated, or disposed of in the state if the state of origin of the waste or the state in which the waste was generated prohibits or limits similar actions within its own boundaries.

